Washington statutes.
RCW 43.101.901

Transfer of conference center.

The legislature authorizes the *department of general administration to transfer the Washington state training and conference center located at 19010 First Avenue, Burien, Washington, 98148, to the criminal justice training commission.

[ 2001 c 166 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "department of general administration" was renamed the "department of enterprise services" by 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 107.